ko: 수프 또는 국물 종류: 소고기 육수; 비스크; 사골 육수; 육수/스톡; 닭 육수; 치킨 누들; 칠리; 차우더; 클램 차우더; 맑은 국물; 크림 수프; 치킨 크림; 양송이 크림; 다시 육수 분말; 가스파초; 검보; 인스턴트 수프 믹스; 렌틸콩 수프; 미소 된장국; 쌀국수 육수; 라면 육수; 라면 수프 베이스; 해산물 차우더; 완두콩; 똠얌; 토마토 수프; 채소 육수; 기타
cs: Druh polévky nebo vývaru: Hovězí vývar; Krémová polévka; Kostní vývar; Vývar/bujón; Kuřecí vývar; Kuřecí s nudlemi; Chili; Chowder; Clam chowder; Čirá polévka; Krémová polévka; Krémová kuřecí; Krémová houbová; Vývar dashi v prášku; Gazpacho; Gumbo; Instantní polévka; Čočková polévka; Miso polévka; Vývar na pho; Vývar na ramen; Polévkový základ na ramen; Chowder z mořských plodů; Hrachová; Tom yum; Rajčatová polévka; Zeleninový vývar; Jiné
zh-TW: 湯品或高湯種類: 牛高湯; 濃湯; 大骨湯; 高湯/原湯; 雞高湯; 雞肉麵湯; 辣肉醬; 巧達濃湯; 蛤蜊巧達濃湯; 清湯; 奶油濃湯; 奶油雞肉濃湯; 奶油蘑菇濃湯; 日式高湯粉; 西班牙冷湯; 秋葵濃湯; 速食湯包; 扁豆湯; 味噌湯; 越南河粉高湯; 拉麵高湯; 拉麵湯底; 海鮮巧達濃湯; 豌豆湯; 冬蔭功; 番茄湯; 蔬菜高湯; 其他
it: Varietà di zuppa o brodo: Brodo di manzo; Bisque; Brodo di ossa; Brodo/Fondo; Brodo di pollo; Zuppa di pollo con noodle; Chili; Chowder; Clam chowder; Zuppa chiara; Zuppa cremosa; Crema di pollo; Crema di funghi; Brodo dashi in polvere; Gazpacho; Gumbo; Preparato per zuppa istantanea; Zuppa di lenticchie; Zuppa di miso; Brodo per pho; Brodo per ramen; Base per zuppa di ramen; Chowder ai frutti di mare; Piselli spezzati; Tom yum; Zuppa di pomodoro; Brodo vegetale; Altro
zh-CN: 汤或肉汤种类: 牛肉汤; 浓汤; 骨汤; 清汤/高汤; 鸡汤; 鸡肉面条汤; 辣肉酱; 杂烩汤; 蛤蜊杂烩汤; 清汤; 奶油汤; 奶油鸡肉汤; 奶油蘑菇汤; 出汁粉; 西班牙冷汤; 秋葵浓汤; 速食汤料包; 扁豆汤; 味噌汤; 越南粉高汤; 拉面高汤; 拉面汤底; 海鲜杂烩汤; 碎豌豆汤; 冬阴功汤; 番茄汤; 蔬菜高汤; 其他
ru: Разновидность супа или бульона: Говяжий бульон; Биск; Костный бульон; Бульон/отвар; Куриный бульон; Куриная лапша; Чили; Чаудер; Клэм-чаудер; Прозрачный суп; Крем-суп; Куриный крем-суп; Грибной крем-суп; Сухой бульон даси; Гаспачо; Гамбо; Суп быстрого приготовления; Чечевичный суп; Мисо-суп; Бульон фо; Бульон для рамэна; Суповая основа для рамэна; Чаудер с морепродуктами; Гороховый суп; Том-ям; Томатный суп; Овощной бульон; Другое
nb: Suppe- eller buljongvariant: Oksekraft; Bisque; Beinkraft; Buljong/kraft; Kyllingkraft; Kylling og nudler; Chili; Chowder; Clam chowder; Klar suppe; Kremsuppe; Kremet kyllingsuppe; Kremet soppsuppe; Dashi-buljongpulver; Gazpacho; Gumbo; Pulversuppe; Linsesuppe; Misosuppe; Pho-kraft; Ramen-kraft; Ramen-suppebase; Seafood chowder; Ertesuppe; Tom yum; Tomatsuppe; Grønnsakskraft; Annet
el: Ποικιλία σούπας ή ζωμού: Ζωμός βοδινού; Μπισκ; Ζωμός οστών; Ζωμός; Ζωμός κοτόπουλου; Κοτόσουπα με νουντλς; Τσίλι; Τσάουντερ; Τσάουντερ με αχιβάδες; Διαυγής σούπα; Σούπα βελουτέ; Κρέμα κοτόπουλο; Κρέμα μανιτάρι; Σκόνη ζωμού ντάσι; Γκασπάτσο; Γκάμπο; Μείγμα στιγμιαίας σούπας; Σούπα φακής; Σούπα μίσο; Ζωμός φο; Ζωμός ράμεν; Βάση σούπας ράμεν; Τσάουντερ θαλασσινών; Σούπα με σπαστό αρακά; Τομ γιαμ; Ντοματόσουπα; Ζωμός λαχανικών; Άλλο
th: ประเภทของซุปหรือน้ำซุป: น้ำซุปเนื้อ; บิสก์; น้ำซุปกระดูก; น้ำซุป/น้ำสต็อก; น้ำซุปไก่; ซุปไก่ใส่เส้น; ชิลลี; ซุปเชาเดอร์; ซุปหอยลายเชาเดอร์; ซุปใส; ซุปครีม; ซุปครีมไก่; ซุปครีมเห็ด; ผงซุปดาชิ; กัซปาโช; กัมโบ; ซุปกึ่งสำเร็จรูป; ซุปถั่วเลนทิล; ซุปมิโซะ; น้ำซุปเฝอ; น้ำซุปราเมง; ซุปราเมงเข้มข้น; ซุปซีฟู้ดเชาเดอร์; ซุปถั่วสปลิทพี; ต้มยำ; ซุปมะเขือเทศ; น้ำซุปผัก; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Polievka alebo vývar rôznych druhov: Hovädzí vývar; Bisque; Vývar z kostí; Vývar/bujón; Kurací vývar; Kuracia rezancová; Chili; Chowder; Chowder zo škľabiek; Číra polievka; Krémová polievka; Kuracia krémová polievka; Šampiňónová krémová polievka; Práškový vývar Dashi; Gazpacho; Gumbo; Instantná polievková zmes; Šošovicová polievka; Miso polievka; Vývar Pho; Vývar na ramen; Polievkový základ na ramen; Chowder z morských plodov; Hrachová polievka; Tom Yum; Paradajková polievka; Zeleninový vývar; Iné
ja: スープまたはブロスの種類: ビーフブロス; ビスク; ボーンブロス; ブロス / ストック; チキンブロス; チキンヌードル; チリ; チャウダー; クラムチャウダー; クリアスープ; クリームスープ; チキンクリーム; マッシュルームクリーム; 粉末だし; ガスパチョ; ガンボ; インスタントスープミックス; レンズ豆のスープ; 味噌汁; フォーのスープ; ラーメンのスープ; ラーメンスープの素; シーフードチャウダー; スプリットピー; トムヤム; トマトスープ; 野菜だし; その他
pl: Odmiana zupy lub bulionu: Bulion wołowy; Bisque; Bulion kostny; Bulion / wywar; Bulion z kurczaka; Rosół z makaronem; Chili; Chowder; Chowder z małżami; Bulion; Zupa krem; Krem z kurczaka; Krem grzybowy; Bulion dashi w proszku; Gazpacho; Gumbo; Zupa w proszku; Zupa z soczewicy; Zupa miso; Bulion pho; Bulion ramen; Baza do zupy ramen; Chowder z owocami morza; Grochówka; Tom yum; Zupa pomidorowa; Bulion warzywny; Inne
lt-LT: Sriubos arba sultinio rūšis: Jautienos sultinys; Trinta sriuba („Bisque“); Kaulų sultinys; Sultinys; Vištienos sultinys; Vištienos su makaronais; Čili; Tiršta sriuba („Chowder“); Moliuskų sriuba („Clam Chowder“); Skaidri sriuba; Trinta sriuba; Trinta vištienos sriuba; Trinta grybų sriuba; „Dashi“ sultinio milteliai; Gaspacho; Gumbo; Greitai paruošiamos sriubos mišinys; Lęšių sriuba; Miso sriuba; Pho sultinys; Ramenų sultinys; Ramenų sriubos bazė; Tiršta jūros gėrybių sriuba; Skaldytų žirnių; Tom Yum; Pomidorų sriuba; Daržovių sultinys; Kita
vi: Loại súp hoặc nước dùng: Nước hầm bò; Bisque; Nước hầm xương; Nước dùng/Nước hầm; Nước hầm gà; Súp mì gà; Chili; Súp chowder; Súp ngao chowder; Súp trong; Súp kem; Súp kem gà; Súp kem nấm; Bột nước dùng dashi; Gazpacho; Gumbo; Bột súp ăn liền; Súp đậu lăng; Súp miso; Nước dùng phở; Nước dùng ramen; Cốt súp ramen; Súp hải sản chowder; Đậu Hà Lan tách hạt; Tom yum; Súp cà chua; Nước dùng rau củ; Khác
sv: Soppa- eller buljongvariant: Nötbuljong; Bisque; Benbuljong; Buljong/fond; Hönsbuljong; Kycklingnudlar; Chili; Chowder; Clam chowder; Klar soppa; Krämsoppa; Krämig kycklingsoppa; Krämig svampsoppa; Dashibuljongpulver; Gazpacho; Gumbo; Snabbsoppa; Linssoppa; Misosoppa; Pho-buljong; Ramen-buljong; Ramen-soppbas; Seafood chowder; Ärtsoppa; Tom yum; Tomatsoppa; Grönsaksbuljong; Annat
hr-HR: Raznovrsna juha ili temeljac: Goveđi bujon; Bisque; Bujon od kostiju; Bujon/temeljac; Pileći bujon; Kokošja juha s rezancima; Čili; Chowder; Chowder od školjki; Bistra juha; Krem juha; Krem juha od piletine; Krem juha od gljiva; Dashi temeljac u prahu; Gazpacho; Gumbo; Instant juha; Juha od leće; Miso juha; Pho bujon; Ramen bujon; Baza za ramen juhu; Chowder od plodova mora; Juha od suhog graška; Tom Yum; Juha od rajčice; Povrtni bujon; Ostalo
es: Variedad de sopa o caldo: Caldo de res; Bisque; Caldo de huesos; Caldo o fondo; Caldo de pollo; Sopa de fideos con pollo; Chili; Chowder; Crema de almejas; Sopa clara; Crema; Crema de pollo; Crema de champiñones; Caldo dashi en polvo; Gazpacho; Gumbo; Sopa instantánea; Sopa de lentejas; Sopa miso; Caldo pho; Caldo para ramen; Base de sopa para ramen; Crema de mariscos; Guisantes partidos; Tom Yum; Sopa de tomate; Caldo de verduras; Otro
pt-BR: Sopa ou caldo variedade: Caldo de carne; Bisque; Caldo de osso; Caldo/Fundo; Caldo de galinha; Canja de galinha; Chili; Chowder; Clam chowder; Caldo claro; Sopa cremosa; Creme de frango; Creme de cogumelos; Caldo dashi em pó; Gaspacho; Gumbo; Mistura para sopa instantânea; Sopa de lentilha; Sopa de missô; Caldo de pho; Caldo de ramen; Base para sopa de ramen; Chowder de frutos do mar; Ervilha partida; Tom yum; Sopa de tomate; Caldo de legumes; Outros
sl-SI: Vrsta juhe ali jušne osnove: Goveja jušna osnova; Kremna juha iz rakov; Jušna osnova iz kosti; Jušna osnova; Piščančja jušna osnova; Piščančja juha z rezanci; Čili; Gosta juha (Chowder); Gosta juha s školjkami; Bistra juha; Kremna juha; Kremna piščančja juha; Kremna gobova juha; Jušna osnova v prahu (Dashi); Gazpačo; Gumbo; Mešanica za instant juho; Lečina juha; Miso juha; Jušna osnova Pho; Jušna osnova Ramen; Osnova za Ramen juho; Gosta juha z morskimi sadeži; Grahova juha; Tom Yum; Paradižnikova juha; Zelenjavna jušna osnova; Drugo
da: Suppe- eller bouillontype: Oksebouillon; Bisque; Benbouillon; Bouillon/fond; Kyllingebouillon; Hønsekødssuppe med nudler; Chili; Chowder; Clam chowder; Klar suppe; Cremesuppe; Cremet kyllingesuppe; Cremet champignonsuppe; Dashi-bouillonpulver; Gazpacho; Gumbo; Suppepulver; Linsesuppe; Misosuppe; Pho-bouillon; Ramen-bouillon; Ramen-suppebase; Seafood chowder; Flækærter; Tom yum; Tomatsuppe; Grøntsagsbouillon; Andet
de: Art der Suppe bzw. Brühe: Rinderbrühe; Bisque; Knochenbrühe; Brühe/Fond; Hühnerbrühe; Hühnernudelsuppe; Chili; Chowder; Clam Chowder; Klare Suppe; Cremesuppe; Hühnercremesuppe; Pilzcremesuppe; Dashi-Pulver; Gazpacho; Gumbo; Instantsuppe; Linsensuppe; Misosuppe; Pho-Brühe; Ramen-Brühe; Ramen-Suppenbasis; Seafood Chowder; Erbsensuppe; Tom Yum; Tomatensuppe; Gemüsebrühe; Sonstige
pt-PT: Variedade de sopa ou caldo: Caldo de carne; Bisque; Caldo de ossos; Caldo/fundo; Caldo de galinha; Canja de galinha; Chili; Chowder; Clam chowder; Sopa clara; Sopa de creme; Creme de frango; Creme de cogumelos; Caldo dashi em pó; Gaspacho; Gumbo; Mistura para sopa instantânea; Sopa de lentilhas; Sopa miso; Caldo pho; Caldo para ramen; Base de sopa para ramen; Chowder de marisco; Ervilhas partidas; Tom yum; Sopa de tomate; Caldo de legumes; Outro
nl: Soep of bouillon variëteit: Runderbouillon; Bisque; Bottenbouillon; Bouillon; Kippenbouillon; Kippensoep met noedels; Chili; Chowder; Clam chowder; Heldere soep; Crèmesoep; Kippencrèmesoep; Champignoncrèmesoep; Dashi-bouillonpoeder; Gazpacho; Gumbo; Instant soepmix; Linzensoep; Misosoep; Pho-bouillon; Ramen-bouillon; Ramen-soepbasis; Vischowder; Spliterwtensoep; Tom yum; Tomatensoep; Groentebouillon; Overige
fi: Keitto- tai liemityyppi: Lihaliemi; Bisque; Luuliemi; Liemi; Kananliemi; Kananuudeli; Chili; Chowder; Simpukkachowder; Kirkas keitto; Kermakeitto; Kermainen kanakeitto; Kermainen sienikeitto; Dashi-liemijauhe; Gazpacho; Gumbo; Pikakeittoaines; Linssikeitto; Misokeitto; Pho-liemi; Ramen-liemi; Ramen-keittopohja; Merellinen chowder; Hernekeitto; Tom yam; Tomaattikeitto; Kasvisliemi; Muu
fr: Variété de soupe ou de bouillon: Bouillon de bœuf; Bisque; Bouillon d’os; Bouillon/Fond; Bouillon de poulet; Soupe poulet et nouilles; Chili; Chaudrée; Chaudrée de palourdes; Bouillon clair; Soupe à la crème; Crème de poulet; Crème de champignons; Poudre de bouillon dashi; Gaspacho; Gombo; Préparation pour soupe instantanée; Soupe aux lentilles; Soupe miso; Bouillon de pho; Bouillon pour ramen; Base de soupe pour ramen; Chaudrée de fruits de mer; Pois cassés; Tom yum; Soupe à la tomate; Bouillon de légumes; Autre
ro-RO: Sortiment de supă sau bulion: Supă de vită; Supă cremă bisque; Supă de oase; Supă clară/zeamă; Supă de pui; Supă de pui cu tăiței; Chili; Chowder; Chowder cu scoici; Supă clară; Supă cremă; Supă cremă de pui; Supă cremă de ciuperci; Pudră pentru supă Dashi; Gazpacho; Gumbo; Amestec pentru supă instant; Supă de linte; Supă Miso; Supă Pho; Supă Ramen; Bază pentru supă Ramen; Chowder cu fructe de mare; Mazăre despicată; Tom Yum; Supă de roșii; Supă de legume; Altele
tr: Çorba veya et suyu çeşidi: Sığır et suyu; Bisk; Kemik suyu; Et suyu/Bulyon; Tavuk suyu; Tavuklu şehriye; Chili; Chowder; Clam chowder; Berrak çorba; Kremalı çorba; Kremalı tavuk; Kremalı mantar; Dashi bulyon tozu; Gazpacho; Gumbo; Hazır çorba karışımı; Mercimek çorbası; Miso çorbası; Pho suyu; Ramen suyu; Ramen çorba bazı; Deniz ürünlü chowder; Kırık bezelye; Tom yum; Domates çorbası; Sebze suyu; Diğer
hu: Leves vagy alaplé fajtája: Marhaalaplé; Bisque; Csontalaplé; Alaplé/Húsleves; Csirkealaplé; Csirkehúsleves tésztával; Chili; Chowder; Kagylós chowder; Erőleves; Krémleves; Csirkekrémleves; Gombakrémleves; Dashi alaplé por; Gazpacho; Gumbo; Instant levespor; Lencseleves; Miso leves; Pho alaplé; Ramen alaplé; Ramen levesalap; Tenger gyümölcsei chowder; Sárgaborsóleves; Tom yum; Paradicsomleves; Zöldségalaplé; Egyéb
bg-BG: Вид супа или бульон: Говежди бульон; Биск; Костен бульон; Бульон/основа; Пилешки бульон; Пилешка супа с фиде; Чили; Чаудър; Чаудър с миди; Бистра супа; Крем супа; Крем супа от пиле; Крем супа от гъби; Даши бульон на прах; Гаспачо; Гъмбо; Инстантна супа; Супа от леща; Мисо супа; Бульон за фо; Бульон за рамен; Супена основа за рамен; Чаудър с морски дарове; Грахова супа (белен грах); Том ям; Доматена супа; Зеленчуков бульон; Друго
en: Soup or broth variety: Beef Broth; Bisque; Bone Broth; Broth/Stock; Chicken Broth; Chicken Noodle; Chili; Chowder; Clam Chowder; Clear Soup; Cream Soup; Cream of Chicken; Cream of Mushroom; Dashi Stock Powder; Gazpacho; Gumbo; Instant Soup Mix; Lentil Soup; Miso Soup; Pho Broth; Ramen Broth; Ramen Soup Base; Seafood Chowder; Split Pea; Tom Yum; Tomato Soup; Vegetable Broth; Other